Indiana, session 2026, SB164.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 15-11-2-10 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) The department shall conduct a study to
evaluate the feasibility of establishing community or urban
microfarm zones statewide.
(b) The study conducted under subsection (a) must include the
following:
(1) A summary of existing studies and literature regarding the
feasibility of establishing community or urban microfarm
zones statewide.
(2) Identification of zoning templates and best practices for
community or urban microfarm management.
(3) Opportunities for partnerships with the Purdue University
cooperative extension service, local health departments,
health care providers, and educational institutions.
(c) Not later than December 1, 2027, the department shall
submit a report to the general assembly, in an electronic format
under IC 5-14-6, with the following information:
(1) The findings regarding subsection (b)(1) through (b)(3).
(2) A specific finding as to:
(A) whether and how community or urban microfarm
SEA 164

2
zones could work in Indiana; and
(B) what options are available for future pilot programs or
technical assistance.
(3) A recommendation for:
(A) standards to ensure safety and compatibility; and
(B) future legislation to implement community or urban
microfarm zones.
SEA 164

President of the Senate
President Pro Tempore
Speaker of the House of Representatives
Governor of the State of Indiana
Date: Time:
SEA 164